Mississippi, session 2026, HB4136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Lee County, Mississippi, in its discretion, may authorize the use of radar speed detection equipment by approval by a unanimous vote of the board, and such approval shall be spread upon the board minutes of the county.  If approval is granted, the board shall govern the use of such equipment by the Lee County Sheriff's Department on roads outside of municipal limits in school zones, when school activities are occurring, in the county. As used under this section by appropriate warning "school zone" means a designated roadway segment approaching, adjacent to, and beyond school buildings or grounds, or along which school related activities occur. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.